Minnesota, session 2025-2026, HF46.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 62Q.78, is amended by adding a subdivision to read: new text begin Subd. 9. new text end new text begin Designation of payment. new text end new text begin Upon written request by an enrollee, a dental organization shall provide payment for dental care services directly to the rendering dentist regardless of the dentist's participation in the dental organization's provider network. new text end